test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UNG_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'ahl
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäseehl
